Arkansas, session 2025, SB271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(j), concerning candidate filing
procedures for school board elections, is amended to read as follows:
(j) On the day after the deadline for candidates to file for a
position on the board of directors by petition, the The county clerk of the
county in which the school district is domiciled for administrative purposes
shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the names of
those candidates who are registered voters in the school district and the
electoral zone, if applicable, and who have qualified for the ballot by
petition:
(1) On the date of the certification deadlines under § 7-7-
304(b) in even-numbered years for school elections held concurrently with a
preferential primary election; or
(2) On the date of the certification deadline under § 7-5-203(b)
in even-numbered years for school elections held concurrently with a general
*SSS159*
03-11-2025 10:42:55 SSS159

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 S3/11/25 SB271
election.

/s/Crowell

































03-11-2025 10:42:55 SSS159